Maine, session 132, LD227.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 14 MRSA §8104-A, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Injury or death of Legislator. The Legislature is liable for bodily injury to or
death of a Legislator that results from an act of violence occurring in the State House or
legislative space in the Burton M. Cross Building.